Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Uniform Criminal Extradition Act

440.150.
Citation of KRS 440.150 to 440.420.

KRS

440.150

to

440.420

may be cited as the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

440.160.
Definitions for KRS 440.150 to 440.420.

Where appearing in KRS

440.150

to

440.420

, the term “Governor” includes any person performing the functions of Governor by authority of the law of this state. The term “executive authority” includes the Governor, and any person performing the functions of Governor in a state other than this state, and the term “state,” referring to a state other than this state, includes any other state or territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States of America.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 2, effective June 16, 1960.

440.170.
Duty of Governor.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

440.150

to

440.420

, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all Acts of Congress enacted in pursuance thereof, it is the duty of the Governor of this state to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 3, effective June 16, 1960.

440.180.
Conditions of demand for extradition.

No demand for the extradition of a person charged with crime in another state shall be recognized by the Governor unless in writing alleging, except in cases arising under KRS

440.210

, that the accused was present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that thereafter he fled from the state, and accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by information supported by affidavit in the state having jurisdiction of the crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a magistrate there, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued thereupon; or by a copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution thereof, together with a statement by the executive authority of the demanding state that the person claimed has escaped from confinement or has broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole. The indictment, information, or affidavit made before the magistrate must substantially charge the person demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that state; and the copy of indictment, information, affidavit, judgment of conviction, or sentence must be authenticated by the executive authority making the demand.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 4, effective June 16, 1960.

440.190.
Investigation by Attorney General.

When a demand shall be made upon the Governor of this state by the executive authority of another state for the surrender of a person so charged with crime, the Governor may call upon the Attorney General or any other officer of this state to investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to him the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he ought to be surrendered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 5, effective June 16, 1960.

440.200.
Demand by this state — Agreement with other state — Demand on involuntary departure.

When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this state with a crime, and such person is imprisoned or is held under criminal proceedings then pending against him in another state, the Governor of this state may agree with the executive authority of such other state for the extradition of such person before the conclusion of such proceedings or his term of sentence in such other state, upon condition that such person be returned to such other state at the expense of this state as soon as the prosecution in this state is terminated.

The Governor of this state may also surrender on demand of the executive authority of any other state any person in this state who is charged in the manner provided in KRS

440.180

with having violated the laws of the state whose executive authority is making the demand, even though such person left the demanding state involuntarily.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 6, effective June 16, 1960.

440.210.
Demand when act in this state results in crime in other state.

The Governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in such other state in the manner provided in KRS

440.180

with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand, and the provisions of KRS

440.150

to

440.420

not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to such cases, even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime, and has not fled therefrom.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 7, effective June 16, 1960.

440.220.
Warrant of arrest by Governor.

If the Governor decides that the demand should be complied with, he shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal, and be directed to any peace officer or other person whom he may think fit to entrust with the execution thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 8, effective June 16, 1960.

440.230.
Execution of warrant.

Such warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he may be found within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant, and to deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of KRS

440.150

to

440.420

, to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 9, effective June 16, 1960.

440.240.
Assistance in making arrest.

Every such peace officer or other person empowered to make the arrest, shall have the same authority, in arresting the accused, to command assistance therein, as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 10, effective June 16, 1960.

440.250.
Procedure upon arrest.

No person arrested upon such warrant shall be delivered over to the agent whom the executive authority demanding him shall have appointed to receive him unless he shall first be taken forthwith before a judge of a Circuit Court or District Court in this state, who shall inform him of the demand made for his surrender and of the crime with which he is charged, and that he has the right to demand and procure legal counsel; and if the prisoner or his counsel shall state that he or they desire to test the legality of his arrest, the judge of such court shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When such writ is applied for, notice thereof, and of the time and place of hearing thereon, shall be given to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the arrest is made and in which the accused is in custody, and to the said agent of the demanding state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 11, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 453, effective January 2, 1978.

440.260.
Confinement of prisoner en route — Duty of jailer — Evidence of extradition.

The officer or persons executing the Governor’s warrant of arrest, or the agent of the demanding state to whom the prisoner may have been delivered may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he may pass; and the keeper of such jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or person having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route, such officer or person being chargeable with the expense of keeping.

The officer or agent of a demanding state to whom a prisoner may have been delivered following extradition proceedings in another state, or to whom a prisoner may have been delivered after waiving extradition in such other state, and who is passing through this state with such a prisoner for the purpose of immediately returning such prisoner to the demanding state may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he may pass; and the keeper of such jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or agent having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route, such officer or agent, however, being chargeable with the expense of keeping; provided, however, that such officer or agent shall produce and show to the keeper of such jail satisfactory written evidence of the fact that he is actually transporting such prisoner to the demanding state after a requisition by the executive authority of such demanding state. Such prisoner shall not be entitled to demand a new requisition while in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 13, effective June 16, 1960.

440.270.
Person charged with crime in other state may be arrested in this state — Procedure — Warrant required.

Whenever any person within this state shall be charged on the oath of any credible person before any judge of this state with the commission of any crime in any other state and, except in cases arising under KRS

440.210

, with having fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole, or whenever complaint shall have been made before any judge in this state setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another state that a crime has been committed in such other state and that the accused has been charged in such state with the commission of the crime, and, except in cases arising under KRS

440.210

, has fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole and is believed to be in this state, the judge shall issue a warrant directed to any peace officer commanding him to apprehend the person named therein, wherever he may be found in this state, and to bring him before the Circuit or District Judge of the county in which he was arrested who may be available in or convenient of access to the place where the arrest may be made, to answer the charge or complaint and affidavit, and a certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

No bail bondsman or his agent shall arrest, detain, imprison, or remove from the state any person for having broken the terms of his bail unless a warrant for that person’s arrest has been issued as provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

Any violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed as a Class D felony and punishable thereas.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 14, effective June 16, 1960; 1976, ch. 95, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 454, effective January 2, 1978.

440.280.
Arrest may be made without warrant — Conditions — Procedure.

The arrest of a person may be lawfully made also by any peace officer or a private person, without a warrant upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year, but when so arrested the accused must be taken before a judge with all practicable speed and complaint must be made against him under oath setting forth the ground for the arrest as in the preceding section; and thereafter his answer shall be heard as if he had been arrested on a warrant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 15, effective June 16, 1960.

440.290.
Commitment in jail pending Governor’s warrant issued on requisition.

If from the examination before the judge it appears that the person held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and, except in cases arising under KRS

440.210

, that he has fled from justice, the judge must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him to the county jail for such a time not exceeding thirty (30) days and specified in the warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the Governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in KRS

440.300

, or until he shall be legally discharged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 16, effective June 16, 1960.

440.300.
Bail permitted — Conditions.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, a judge in this state may admit the person arrested to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties, and in such sum as he deems proper, conditioned for his appearance before him at a time specified in such bond, and for his surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the Governor of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 17, effective June 16, 1960.

440.310.
Failure to arrest under warrant of Governor — Discharge — Recommitment.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the Governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, the judge may discharge him or may recommit him for a further period not to exceed sixty (60) days, or may again take bail for his appearance and surrender, as provided in KRS

440.300

, but within a period not to exceed sixty (60) days after the date of such new bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 18, effective June 16, 1960.

440.320.
Forfeiture of bond.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender himself according to the conditions of his bond, the judge, by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his immediate arrest without warrant if he be within this state. Recovery may be had on such bond in the name of the state as in the case of other bonds given by the accused in criminal proceedings within this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 19, effective June 16, 1960.

440.330.
Extradition may be granted person accused or convicted in this state — Conditions.

The Governor may in his discretion surrender upon demand of the executive authority of another state, any person found in this state, notwithstanding the fact that a criminal prosecution or charges under the laws of this state are pending against such person, or that such person has been convicted in this state and is serving a sentence in any penal institution of this state. The Governor may condition the release of such prisoner to the demanding state upon such terms as he may stipulate, including the condition that the prisoner be returned to this state immediately after trial and before commencing the service of sentence, if any, in the demanding state; provided, however, in no case shall surrender of such prisoner be construed as a complete relinquishment of jurisdiction by this state, but such prisoner shall forthwith be returned to the custody of this state at expense of the demanding state, immediately after trial in the demanding state, or the completion of sentence therein, as the case may be.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 20, effective June 16, 1960.

440.340.
Inquiry as to guilt prohibited after demand for extradition.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of which he is charged may not be inquired into by the Governor or in any proceeding after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in legal form as above provided shall have been presented to the Governor, except as it may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 21, effective June 16, 1960.

440.350.
Control of warrant.

The Governor may recall his warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he deems proper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 22, effective June 16, 1960.

440.360.
Warrant of Governor to receiving officer.

Whenever the Governor of this state shall demand a person charged with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of his bail, probation or parole in this state, from the executive authority of any other state, or from the Chief Justice or an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand under the laws of the United States, he shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state, to some agent, commanding him to receive the person so charged if delivered to him and convey him to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 23, effective June 16, 1960.

440.370.
Application for return of person charged with crime — Person convicted — Requisites and procedures.

When the return to this state of a person charged with crime in this state is required, the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney shall present to the Governor his written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged, in which application shall be stated the name of the person so charged, the crime charged against him, the approximate time, place and circumstances of its commission, the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the accused therein at the time the application is made and certifying that, in the opinion of the said prosecuting attorney the ends of justice require the arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

When the return to this state is required of a person who has been convicted of a crime in this state and escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole, the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney of the county in which the offense was committed, the chairman of the parole board, or the warden of the institution or county attorney of the county from which escape was made, shall present to the Governor a written application for a requisition for the return of such person, in which application shall be stated the name of the person, the crime of which he was convicted, the circumstances of his escape from confinement or of the breach of the terms of his bail, probation or parole, the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the person therein at the time application is made.

The application shall be verified by affidavit, shall be executed in triplicate and shall be accompanied by three (3) certified copies of the indictment returned, or affidavit made before a judge and warrant of arrest issued thereon, stating the offense with which the accused is charged, or of the judgment of conviction or of the sentence. The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney, chairman of the parole board or warden shall also attach such further affidavits and other documents in triplicate as he or the Attorney General may deem proper to be submitted with such application. When the application is made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall, unless the case is of the type mentioned in KRS

440.210

, submit to the Governor proof in the form of an affidavit that the accused was personally present in this state at the time of commission of the crime charged. One (1) copy of the application, with the action of the Governor indicated by endorsement thereon, and one (1) of the certified copies of the indictment, affidavit and warrant, or of the judgment of conviction or of the sentence shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State to remain of record in that office. The other copies of all papers shall be forwarded with the Governor’s requisition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 24, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 455, effective January 2, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An application for requisition by another state was legally insufficient where the affidavit charging the offense was not sworn to before a judge or magistrate.

OAG 63-6

.

An application for requisition is not legally sufficient under the statute where the papers constituting the application do not set out a definite time of commission of the offense with which the fugitive is charged.

OAG 63-76

.

For the requisition to be in order it is not necessary that the indictment specify the time of commission of the crime, but this information should at least be in the verified application of the prosecuting attorney.

OAG 63-76

.

A requisition application was insufficient where it was based upon a warrant of arrest issued upon an affidavit sworn to before a notary public.

OAG 63-142

.

The circumstances of the commission of the crime must be stated in the application for requisition and copies of the warrant of arrest issued on the complaint must be attached.

OAG 63-400

.

An application for requisition of a fugitive from Kentucky which did not contain a statement of circumstances of escape from confinement or breach of conditions of bail, probation or parole was not sufficient.

OAG 63-411

.

Requisition papers that contained no copies of the affidavit charging the offense and no statement in the papers of the time of the commission of the offense were insufficient.

OAG 63-1080

.

A deputy Circuit Court clerk has the authority to certify as true copies various Circuit Court documents, such as indictments and warrants for applications for requisitions in extradition matters, where the deputy Circuit Court clerk has been duly authorized and supervised by the circuit clerk to perform such a statutory function.

OAG 80-174

.

In instances where fugitive is charged with a misdemeanor offense in Kentucky and waives extradition, the prosecuting attorney is required to make formal application to the Governor of Kentucky in order to secure the appointment of an agent who will be reimbursed for expenses incurred in making the trip to return the fugitive.

OAG 90-98

.

The Governor of Kentucky is the only state official who has authority to designate an officer or agent for the Commonwealth of Kentucky to return a fugitive from another state to Kentucky when that fugitive is charged with a misdemeanor and has waived formal extradition proceedings.

OAG 90-98

.

440.375.
Extradition of persons charged with custodial interference.

The county attorney shall present to the Governor a written application prepared in accordance with KRS

440.370

for the return from any other state of any person charged with a violation of KRS

509.070

.

Upon receipt of the county attorney’s application, the Governor may immediately demand from the executive authority of any other state the return of any person charged with a violation of KRS

509.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

440.380.
Waiver of extradition — Procedure — Expenses.

When a person charged with commission of a felony in this state or with having been convicted of a felony here and having escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole is arrested in another state and waives extradition proceedings, the county judge/executive of the county in which the felony was committed, or from which the escape was made, may, upon filing of a verified application by the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney setting forth the fact of waiver and making all statements required by subsection (1) or subsection (2) of KRS

440.370

, enter an order designating an officer to return the fugitive to this state without benefit of any procedure incidental to extradition proceedings. Upon entry of such order the officer so designated shall be authorized to go after and return the fugitive as the agent of this state and shall receive from the State Treasury the same payment for his expenses as is provided by KRS

440.090

for agents acting under requisition of the Governor. If, in attempting to reclaim the fugitive, the agent is acting within the course and scope of his employment, the amount due shall be paid over to the agent’s employer instead of the agent. Claims for reimbursement of expenses under this subsection shall be accompanied by certified copies of the verified application for appointment of the agent and the order of appointment, together with a copy of any process showing delivery of the fugitive to the jailer upon return to this state. If the agent is not given possession of the fugitive for reasons beyond the agent’s control, he, or his employer, shall nevertheless be reimbursed as provided herein, if it is shown that prior to his appointment as agent and before departure from the state the fugitive had executed in the presence of any officer authorized to administer an oath a written waiver stating that he consents to return to this state without extradition.

All legal costs incurred in apprehending and securing in this state a fugitive wanted in another state shall be paid by the agent of the state demanding him before the agent is permitted to remove him or receive him into custody.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 25, effective June 16, 1960; 2000, ch. 30, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section a person appointed by order of the county judge as agent of this state to return a fugitive upon waiver of extradition is not entitled to reimbursement of expenses as provided in KRS

440.090

unless the order of appointment was entered prior to the departure of the agent from this state.

OAG 63-108

.

The county judge has discretion in the matter of designating more than one agent to return a fugitive.

OAG 63-676

.

Under this section the county judge has authority to enter an order designating two (2) officers to return a fugitive when this is requested by the county attorney or Commonwealth’s attorney and information is furnished indicating the need for more than one (1) agent.

OAG 63-676

.

Where the county judge has appointed two (2) officers to return a fugitive under subsection (1) of this section and their papers are otherwise in order, both officers are entitled to be paid their expenses in the same manner in which two (2) agents designated in the Governor’s requisition are paid under this section.

OAG 63-676

.

Although it is not mandatory that a county judge sign an order designating an agent to return a fugitive from justice, he should exercise reasonable discretion and any refusal should be based upon proper grounds.

OAG 65-149

.

Where two (2) agents are appointed to return a fugitive from another state in an extradition case and employ only one private vehicle for their journey to and from the asylum state, the statute requires that each should be compensated at the rate of 10¢ per mile and other necessary expenses.

OAG 67-379

.

Where, under KRS

440.450

, a prisoner is to be brought from another state to Kentucky and then returned to the other state, the state’s agent to return the prisoner should be appointed by the county judge under this section.

OAG 75-373

.

This section does not authorize a Circuit Judge to designate the state’s agent for the return of a fugitive and he has no “inherent power” to make such appointment, it being immaterial that he exercises appellate jurisdiction over the county court.

OAG 75-373

.

Where under this section a state’s agent for the return of a fugitive is appointed and the final return of the fugitive to another state has been made by that state a condition precedent to the release of the fugitive to the Kentucky authorities, the state’s agent may recover his mileage and other necessary expenses for the two (2) round trips involved in view of KRS

440.090

and

440.200

.

OAG 75-373

.

The state is not liable to pay the fees or expenses of boarding prisoners held under fugitive warrants in county jails pursuant to interstate extradition.

OAG 74-807

.

If Kentucky is the demanding authority in extradition matters, even if there was a waiver of the full extradition process by the other state, the legal costs incurred in making the fugitive available must be borne by Kentucky.

OAG 74-815

.

Under this section an order designating an officer to return the fugitive to this State without the benefit of any procedure incidental to extradition proceedings must still be signed by the county judge/executive, since such an order is clearly an executive function requiring the county judge/executive’s authorization.

OAG 78-398

.

A county judge/executive is not authorized to sign an order under this section in cases of waiver of extradition involving a fugitive charged with a misdemeanor and, therefore, the prosecuting attorney is required to make formal application to the Governor under KRS

440.370

in order to secure the appointment of an agent who will be paid travel expenses.

OAG 90-98

.

The Department for Local Government properly denied request for reimbursement of expenses on the grounds that this section does not authorize reimbursement for expenses incurred in the return of a fugitive charged with a misdemeanor.

OAG 90-98

.

The Governor of Kentucky is the only state official who has authority to designate an officer or agent for the Commonwealth of Kentucky to return a fugitive from another state to Kentucky when that fugitive is charged with a misdemeanor and has waived formal extradition proceedings.

OAG 90-98

.

440.390.
Immunity from civil process.

A person brought into this state by, or after waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceeding to answer which he is being or has been returned, until he has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he has had reasonable opportunity to return to the state from which he was extradited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 26, effective June 16, 1960.

440.400.
Waiver of extradition by person arrested in this state — Procedure — Effect.

Any person arrested in this state charged with having committed any crime in another state or alleged to have escaped from confinement, or broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole may waive the issuance and service of the warrant provided for in KRS

440.220

and

440.230

and all other procedure incidental to extradition proceedings, by executing or subscribing in the presence of a judge of any District or Circuit Court within this state a writing which states that he consents to return to the demanding state; provided, however, that before such waiver shall be executed or subscribed by such person it shall be the duty of such judge to inform such person of his rights to the issuance and service of a warrant of extradition and to obtain a writ of habeas corpus as provided for in KRS

440.250

.

If and when such consent has been duly executed it shall forthwith be forwarded to the office of the Secretary of State of this state and filed therein. The judge shall direct the officer having such person in custody to deliver forthwith such person to the duly accredited agent or agents of the demanding state, and shall deliver or cause to be delivered to such agent or agents a copy of such consent; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the rights of the accused person to return voluntarily and without formality to the demanding state, nor shall this waiver procedure be deemed to be an exclusive procedure or to limit the powers, rights or duties of the officers of the demanding state or of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 27, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 456, effective January 2, 1978.

440.410.
Construction against waiver of any of this state’s rights.

Nothing contained in KRS

440.150

to

440.420

shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this state of its right, power, or privilege to try such demanded person for crime committed within this state, or of its right, power, or privilege to regain custody of such person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial, sentence, or punishment for any crime committed within this state, nor shall any proceedings had under KRS

440.150

to

440.420

which result in, or fail to result in, extradition be deemed a waiver by this state of any of its rights, privileges, or jurisdiction in any way whatsoever.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 28, effective June 16, 1960.

440.420.
Returned person subject to prosecution for other crimes.

After a person has been brought back to this state by or after waiver of extradition proceedings, he may be tried in this state for other crimes which he may be charged with having committed here as well as that specified in the requisition for his extradition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 135, § 29, effective June 16, 1960.